Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-351
Installment loan licensee; contacts with borrower; restrictions.

(1) Except as otherwise provided by the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act or other law, an installment loan licensee shall not contact any individual who is not living, residing, or present in the household of the borrower regarding the borrower's obligation to pay a debt, other than the borrower's spouse, the borrower's attorney, another creditor, or a credit reporting agency.

(2) The borrower may waive the benefits of this section at any time by giving consent if such consent is given at a time subsequent to the date the debt arises.

Laws 1965, c. 268, § 18, p. 767;

Laws 1994, LB 979, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 137, § 22;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 29;

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 37;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 72.